Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3308
Compromise by parties to arbitration agreement.

Nothing contained herein shall prevent at any time a written compromise as provided by section 77-3310 by all parties to the agreement made pursuant to section 77-3301, fixing the amounts to be accepted by this and any other state involved in full satisfaction of death taxes.

Laws 1976, LB 584, § 8.